Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-585
Class VI school district; board of education; assistant secretary; compensation.

The school board in a Class VI school district shall select an assistant secretary, who shall not be a member of the board, at a salary to be fixed by the board.

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 298, p. 792;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1104;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 338.